Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.720

Dyslexia recommendations.

(1) By June 1, 2021, the superintendent of public instruction must review the dyslexia advisory council's recommendations required under *RCW 28A.300.710 and make available to school districts:

(a) Best practices for school district implementation of screenings as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff conducting the screenings;

(b) Best practices for using multitiered systems of support to provide interventions as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff in instructional methods specifically targeting students' areas of weakness;

(c) Sample educational information for parents and families related to dyslexia that includes a list of resources for parental support; and

(d) Best practices to address the needs of students above grade two who show indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia.

(2) By February 15, 2022, the superintendent of public instruction must review the dyslexia advisory council's updated report required under *RCW 28A.300.710 and revise the best practices and sample educational information made available to school districts required under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) By November 1, 2022, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the superintendent of public instruction must report to the house of representatives and senate education committees with the following information from the 2021-22 school year:

(a) The number of students: (i) Screened pursuant to RCW 28A.320.260; (ii) with indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia identified under RCW 28A.300.700; and (iii) provided interventions pursuant to RCW 28A.320.260;

(b) Descriptions from school districts of the types of interventions used in accordance with RCW 28A.320.260 and rates of student progress, when available; and

(c) Descriptions from school districts of the issues districts had related to implementing the provisions of RCW 28A.320.260.

[ 2018 c 75 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.300.710 expired August 1, 2023.